Utah statutes.
76-9-1009.   Implementation to be consistent with federal law and civil rights.

All state and local agencies shall implement this part in a manner that is consistent with federal laws that regulate immigration, protect the civil rights of all persons, and establish the privileges and immunities of United States citizens.

